District of Columbia statutes.
16-584

No discharge from employment for garnishment.

No employer shall discharge an employee for the reason that a creditor of the employee has subjected or attempted to subject unpaid earnings of the employee to garnishment or like proceedings directed to the employer for the purpose of paying a judgment.

History

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 679, Pub. L. 92-200, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-584.
1973 Ed., § 16-584.